Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.100

Construction agreements—Property assembly—Demolition of existing structures.

(1) The public stadium authority, the county, and the city, if any, in which the stadium and exhibition center is to be located shall enter into one or more agreements regarding the construction of a stadium and exhibition center. The agreements shall address, but not be limited to:

(a) Expedited permit processing for the design and construction of the stadium and exhibition center project;

(b) Expedited environmental review processing;

(c) Expedited processing of requests for street, right-of-way, or easement vacations necessary for the construction of the stadium and exhibition center project; and

(d) Other items deemed necessary for the design and construction of the stadium and exhibition center project.

(2) The county shall assemble such real property and associated personal property as the public stadium authority and the county mutually determine to be necessary as a site for the stadium and exhibition center. Property that is necessary for this purpose that is owned by the county on or after July 17, 1997, shall be contributed to the authority, and property that is necessary for this purpose that is acquired by the county on or after July 17, 1997, shall be conveyed to the authority. Property that is encumbered by debt may be transferred by the county to the authority, but obligation for payment of the debt may not be transferred.

(3) A new exhibition facility of at least three hundred twenty-five thousand square feet, with adequate on-site parking, shall be constructed and operational before any domed stadium in the county is demolished or rendered unusable. Demolition of any existing structure and construction of the stadium and exhibition center shall be reasonably executed in a manner that minimizes impacts, including access and parking, upon existing facilities, users, and neighborhoods. No county or city may exercise authority under any landmarks preservation statute or ordinance in order to prevent or delay the demolition of any existing domed stadium at the site of the stadium and exhibition center.

[ 1997 c 220 s 109 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]